en: Short grain rices, Round grain rices
da: Kortkornede ris
de: Rundkornreise
es: Arroces de grano corto, Arroces de grano redondo
fi: lyhytjyväiset riisit
fr: Riz à grain court, Riz rond, Riz à grain ovale
hr: Riže kratkog zrna
it: Riso a grano corto, Riso a grana corta
lt: Trumpagrūdžiai ryžiai
nl: Korrelrijst
sv: Rundkorniga ris

en: Camolino rices
fr: Riz Camolino

en: Rices for paella
bg: Ориз за паеля
de: Paella Reis
es: Arroces para paella
fr: Riz pour paellas
hr: Riže za paellu
nl: Paellarijst

en: Rices for porridge, porridge rices
da: Grødris
fi: Puuroriisi
nb: Grødris
sv: Grötris

en: Rices for risotto
bg: Ориз за ризото
de: Risotto Reis
es: Arroces para risotto
fi: risottoriisit
fr: Riz pour risotto
hr: Riže za rižoto
it: Riso per risotto
nl: Risottorijsten
pl: Ryż do risotto, Ryż na risotto
pt: Arrozes para risotto

en: Sant'Andrea Rices
fr: Riz Sant'Andrea

en: Sushi rice, Rices for sushi
bg: Ориз за суши
da: Sushiris
de: Sushi Reis
es: Arroces para sushi
fr: Riz pour sushi
hr: Sushi riža
it: Riso per sushi, riso da sushi
lt: Sushi ryžiai
nl: Sushirijsten
sv: Sushiris
zh: 寿司米

en: Red rices, red rice
bg: Червен ориз
fr: Riz rouge
hr: Crvene riže
it: Risso rosso
ja: 赤米
lt: Raudonieji ryžiai
nl: Rode rijsten

en: Unsalted cooked red rice
fr: Riz rouge cuit non salé

en: Black rices
bg: Черен ориз
fr: Riz noir
hr: Crna riža
it: Riso venere
ja: 黒米
lt: Juodieji ryžiai
nl: Zwarte rijsten, zwarte rijst

en: Arborio rices
bg: Ориз Арборио
de: Arborio Reis
es: Arroces Arborio, Arroz Arborio
fr: Riz arborio
hr: Arborio riža
it: Riso arborio
lt: Arborio ryžiai
nl: Arboriorijsten

en: Bahía rices, Bahia rices
es: Arroces Bahía, Arroz Bahía
fr: Riz Bahía
hr: Bahía riže
nl: Bahiarijsten

en: Balilla x Sollana rices
es: Arroces Balilla x Sollana, Arroz Balilla x Sollana
fr: Riz Balilla x Sollana
hr: Riže balilla x sollana

en: Basmati rices
bg: Ориз Басмати
de: Basmati Reis
es: Arroces Basmati, Arroz Basmati
fi: basmatiriisit
fr: Riz Basmati, Basmati, Riz basmati cru
hr: Basmati riže
it: Riso Basmati
ja: バスマティライス, バスマティ米, バスマティ
lt: Basmati ryžiai
nl: Basmatirijsten, Basmatirijst
pl: Ryż Basmati, ryż siewny indyjski
pt: Arrozes basmati
ru: Рис Басмати

en: Brown Basmati rices
de: Brauner Basmati Reis
es: Arroces Basmati integrales
fr: Riz Basmati complet, Riz Basmati bruns
hr: Smeđe basmati riže
it: Riso Basmati integrale
lt: Rudieji Basmati ryžiai
nl: Zilvervlies basmatirijsten, Zilvervlies basmatirijst

en: Semi-milled Basmati rices
fr: Riz Basmati semi-complet

en: White Basmati rices
de: Weißer Basmati Reis
es: Arroces Basmati blancos
fi: valkoiset basmatiriisit
fr: Riz Basmati blancs
hr: Bijele basmati riže
it: Riso Basmati bianco
lt: Baltieji Basmati ryžiai
nl: Witte basmatirijsten, Witte basmatirijst

en: Bomba rices
de: Bomba Reis
es: Arroces Bomba
fr: Riz Bomba
hr: Bomba riža
it: Riso Bomba
nl: Bombarijsten, Bombarijst

en: Camargue rices
de: Camargue Reis
es: Arroces de Camarga
fr: Riz de Camargue
hr: Camargue riža
nl: Camarguerijsten, Camargue rijst, Camarguerijst

en: Brown Camargue rices
fr: Riz de Camargue complet